en: Accessibility Equipment Accessories
xx: Accessibility Equipment Accessories
cs: Pomůcky pro invalidy – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til mobilitetsudstyr
de: Zubehör für Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen
es: Accesorios para equipos de accesibilidad
fr: Accessoires pour matériel d'accessibilité
it: Accessori ausili accessibilità
ja: 生活補助具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor toegankelijkheidsapparatuur
no: Tilbehør til tilgjengelighetsutstyr
pl: Akcesoria do sprzętu ułatwiającego poruszanie się
pt: Acessórios para equipamento de acessibilidade
ru: Принадлежности для инвалидной техники
sv: Tillbehör till tillgänglighetsutrustning
tr: Kolay Erişim Ekipmanı Aksesuarları

en: Accessibility Furniture & Fixtures
xx: Accessibility Furniture & Fixtures
cs: Nábytek a příslušenství pro osoby s handicapem
da: Møbler og armaturer til mobilitetsudstyr
de: Behindertengerechte Möbel & Vorrichtungen
es: Accesorios y muebles adaptados
fr: Meubles et supports d'accessibilité
it: Mobili e impianti per accessibilità
ja: 生活補助用家具・取付金具
nl: Meubelen en steunen voor toegankelijkheid
no: Tilgjengelighetsmøbler og -inventar
pl: Meble i armatura ułatwiające poruszanie się
pt: Móveis e utensílios de acessibilidade
ru: Специальная мебель и принадлежности
sv: Möbler och inredning för tillgänglighet
tr: Kolay Erişim Mobilya ve Demirbaşları

en: Shower Benches & Seats
xx: Shower Benches & Seats
cs: Lavice a sedátka do sprchy
da: Brusebænke og -stole
de: Duschbänke & -sitze
es: Asientos y bancos para duchas
fr: Bancs et sièges de douche
it: Sedie e panche per doccia
ja: 浴室用椅子
nl: Douchebanken en -stoelen
no: Baderomsbenker og dusjstoler
pl: Siedziska prysznicowe
pt: Bancos e assentos para banho
ru: Скамьи и сидения для душа
sv: Duschbänkar och -säten
tr: Banyo Tabureleri ve Sandalyeleri

en: Walking Aid Accessories
xx: Walking Aid Accessories
cs: Pomůcky k chůzi – příslušenství
da: Tilbehør til ganghjælpemidler
de: Gehhilfenzubehör
es: Accesorios para utensilios para andar
fr: Accessoires pour l'aide à la marche
it: Accessori di ausilio alla deambulazione
ja: 歩行補助具関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor loophulpen
no: Tilbehør til bevegelighetshjelpemidler
pl: Akcesoria do pomocy ułatwiających chodzenie
pt: Acessórios de auxílio para locomoção
ru: Принадлежности для ходунков для пожилых людей
sv: Tillbehör för gånghjälpmedel
tr: Yürüme Yardımcısı Aksesuarları

en: Walking Aids
xx: Walking Aids
cs: Berle\, hole a chodítka
da: Ganghjælpemidler
de: Gehhilfen
es: Utensilios para andar
fr: Aides à la marche
it: Ausili per la deambulazione
ja: 歩行補助用品
nl: Loophulpmiddelen
no: Bevegelighetshjelpemidler
pl: Pomoce ułatwiające chodzenie
pt: Auxílios para locomoção
ru: Вспомогательные приспособления для ходьбы
sv: Hjälpmedel vid gångbesvär
tr: Yürüme Yardımcıları

en: Canes & Walking Sticks
xx: Canes & Walking Sticks
cs: Vycházkové hole
da: Stokke
de: Gehstöcke
es: Bastones para andar
fr: Cannes
it: Bastoni da passeggio
ja: 杖
nl: Wandel- en loopstokken
no: Spaserstokker
pl: Laski
pt: Bengalas
ru: Трости
sv: Käppar
tr: Değnekler ve Bastonlar

en: Crutches
xx: Crutches
cs: Berle
da: Krykker
de: Krücken
es: Muletas
fr: Béquilles
it: Stampelle
ja: 松葉杖
nl: Krukken
no: Krykker
pl: Kule
pt: Muletas
ru: Костыли
sv: Kryckor
tr: Koltuk Değnekleri

en: Walkers
xx: Walkers
cs: Chodítka
da: Gangstativer
de: Rollatoren
es: Andadores
fr: Déambulateurs, Déambulateur
it: Deambulatori
ja: 歩行器具
nl: Looprekken
no: Gåstoler/rullatorer
pl: Balkoniki rehabilitacyjne
pt: Andadores
ru: Ходунки для пожилых людей
sv: Gåstolar och rullatorer
tr: Walker Yürüteçler

en: Occupational & Physical Therapy Equipment
xx: Occupational & Physical Therapy Equipment
cs: Zařízení pro fyzioterapii
da: Udstyr til fysisk terapi
de: Ergo- & Physiotherapeutische Hilfsmittel
es: Equipos de fisioterapia
fr: Matériel d'ergothérapie et de physiothérapie
it: Apparecchiature per fisioterapia
ja: 理学療法機器
nl: Benodigdheden voor fysiotherapie
no: Utstyr til fysioterapi og ergoterapi
pl: Sprzęt do fizjoterapii
pt: Equipamentos de fisioterapia
ru: Оборудование для физиотерапии
sv: Utrustning för sjukgymnastik
tr: İş Terapisi ve Fiziksel Terapi Ekipmanları

en: Electrical Muscle Stimulators
xx: Electrical Muscle Stimulators
cs: Elektrické stimulátory svalů
da: Elektrisk muskelstimulation
de: Elektrische Muskelstimulatoren
es: Estimuladores musculares eléctricos
fr: Électrostimulateurs
it: Elettrostimolatori muscolari
ja: EMS
nl: Elektrische spierstimulators
no: Elektriske muskelstimulatorer
pl: Elektryczne stymulatory mięśni
pt: Estimuladores musculares elétricos
ru: Электрические стимуляторы мышц
sv: Elektriska muskelsimulatorer
tr: Elektrikli Kas Uyarıcılar

en: Therapeutic Swings
xx: Therapeutic Swings
cs: Fyzioterapeutické houpačky
da: Terapigynger
de: Therapieschaukeln
es: Columpios terapéuticos
fr: Balançoires thérapeutiques
it: Amache terapeutiche
ja: セラピー用ブランコ
nl: Therapeutische schommels
no: Terapihusker
pl: Huśtawki terapeutyczne
pt: Balanços terapêuticos
ru: Терапевтические качели
sv: Terapigungor
tr: Terapi Salıncakları

en: Pillboxes
xx: Pillboxes
cs: Krabičky
da: Pilleæsker
de: Pillendosen
es: Pastilleros
fr: Boîtes à pilules
it: Portapillole
ja: ピルケース
nl: Pillendozen
no: Pilleesker
pl: Pudełka na tabletki
pt: Caixinhas de remédios
ru: Коробочки для пилюль
sv: Pilleraskar
tr: İlaç Kutuları

en: Respiratory Care
xx: Respiratory Care
cs: Dýchací pomůcky
da: Respiratorisk pleje
de: Beatmungsmedizin
es: Cuidado respiratorio
fr: Soins respiratoires
it: Apparato respiratorio
ja: 呼吸管理
nl: Ademhalingszorg
no: Åndedrettspleie
pl: Środki ochrony układu oddechowego
pt: Cuidados respiratórios
ru: Средства для лечения респираторных заболеваний
sv: Andningshjälpmedel
tr: Solunum Güçlüğü Tedavisi

en: Nebulizers
xx: Nebulizers
cs: Rozprašovače
da: Sprays
de: Inhalatoren
es: Nebulizadores
fr: Chambres d'inhalation
it: Nebulizzatori
ja: ネブライザー
nl: Vernevelaars
no: Inhalatorer
pl: Nebulizatory
pt: Nebulizadores
ru: Ингаляторы
sv: Nebulisatorer
tr: Nebulizörler

en: Oxygen Tanks
xx: Oxygen Tanks
cs: Kyslíkové láhve
da: Ilttanke
de: Sauerstoffbehälter
es: Tanques de oxígeno
fr: Bouteilles d'oxygène
it: Bombole di ossigeno
ja: 酸素ボンベ
nl: Zuurstoftanks
no: Oksygentanker
pl: Butle tlenowe
pt: Tanques de oxigênio para uso médico
ru: Медицинские кислородные баллоны
sv: Syretanker
tr: Tıbbi Oksijen Tüpleri

en: PAP Machines
xx: PAP Machines
cs: Přístroje pro plicní ventilaci
da: CPAP-maskiner
de: CPAP-Geräte
es: Máquinas CPAP
fr: Machines PPC
it: Macchine a pressione positiva
ja: CPAP本体
nl: CPAP-machines
no: CPAP-maskiner
pl: Aparaty CPAP
pt: Aparelhos de PAP (pressão positiva nas vias aéreas)
ru: Устройства для СИПАП-терапии
sv: CPAP-maskiner
tr: CPAP Makineleri

en: PAP Masks
xx: PAP Masks
cs: Masky pro plicní ventilaci
da: CPAP-masker
de: CPAP-Masken
es: Máscaras CPAP
fr: Masques pour PPC
it: Maschere a pressione positiva
ja: CPAPマスク
nl: CPAP-maskers
no: CPAP-masker
pl: Maski CPAP
pt: Máscaras de PAP (pressão positiva nas vias aéreas)
ru: Маски для СИПАП-терапии
sv: CPAP-masker
tr: CPAP Maskeleri

en: Steam Inhalers
xx: Steam Inhalers
cs: Parní inhalátory
da: Dampinhalatorer
de: Dampfinhalatoren
es: Inhaladores de vapor
fr: Inhalateurs à vapeur
it: Inalatori di vapore
ja: 蒸気吸入器
nl: Stoominhalators
no: Dampinhalatorer
pl: Inhalatory parowe
pt: Inaladores de vapor
ru: Паровые ингаляторы
sv: Ånginhalatorer
tr: Buhar Maskeleri

en: Specimen Cups
xx: Specimen Cups
cs: Kalíšky na vzorky
da: Prøvebægre
de: Probenbehälter
es: Vasos para muestras
fr: Contenants à échantillons
it: Contenitori per urine
ja: 検体採取用カップ
nl: Samplecontainers
no: Prøvekopper
pl: Pojemniki na próbki do badań laboratoryjnych
pt: Recipientes de coleta
ru: Емкости для медицинских анализов
sv: Provkoppar
tr: Numune Kapları

en: Spermicides
xx: Spermicides
cs: Spermicidní přípravky
da: Sæddræbende creme
de: Spermizide
es: Espermicidas
fr: Spermicides
it: Spermicidi
ja: 殺精子剤
nl: Zaaddodende pasta's
no: Sæddrepende midler
pl: Środki plemnikobójcze
pt: Espermicidas
ru: Спермициды
sv: Spermiedödande medel
tr: Spermisidler